Utah statutes.
23-19-12.   Instruction in hunter education -- Issuance of certificate of
competency.
The Division of Wildlife Resources shall provide a course of instruction in
the safe handling of firearms, conservation, hunting ethics, and related
subject matter for individuals interested in obtaining an instructor's
certificate in hunter education. Certified instructors will, on a voluntary
basis, give instruction in the course of hunter education, as established by
the Division of Wildlife Resources, to all eligible persons who, upon the
successful completion of the course, shall be issued a certificate of
competency in hunter education.
